Hawaii statutes.
[§261-15.6] Annual registration fee.
The department shall assess and collect an annual registration fee of $10 from
each operator of aircraft required to be registered under section 261-15.5. [L
1985, c 299, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next